csv2fst/yaml_output/VTA_IND_aw.yaml
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimikaagosiinaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimikaagonaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimikaagosiinaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimikaagonaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimikaagosiinaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimikaagonaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omikaagosiinaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omikaagonaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagosiininaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagoninaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omikaagosiinaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omikaagonaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimikaagosiiminaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimikaagominaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimikaagosiiminaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimikaagominaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimikaagosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimikaagonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimikaagosiinaawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimikaagonaawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimikaagosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimikaagonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omikaagosiinaawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omikaagonaawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagosiininaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagoninaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omikaagosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omikaagonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimikaagosiiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimikaagominaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagosiiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagominaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimikoosinooninimwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimikooninimwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimikoosinooninaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimikooninaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimikawaasiidogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimikawaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimikawimaasiidogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimikawimaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimikawaasiidog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimikawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimikawisiimwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimikawimwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimikawaasiwaawaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimikawaawaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaasiwaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimikawaasiwaawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimikawaawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimikawisiiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimikawiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimikawisiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimikawinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimikawaasiidogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimikawaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaasiidogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimikawaasiidog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimikawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimikawisiiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimikawiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimikaagosiidogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimikaagodogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimikaagosiiwaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimikaagowaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimikaagosiidogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimikaagodogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikawaasiwaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikawaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimikaagosiinaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimikaagonaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagosiinaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagonaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omikaagosiiwaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omikaagowaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omikaagosiidogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omikaagodogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimikaagosiidog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimikaagodog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimikaagosiiwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimikaagowaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimikaagosiidog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimikaagodog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikawaasiidogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimikaagosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimikaagonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimikaagoosiimwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimikaagoomwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimikaagoosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimikaagoonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimikawaasiwaanaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimikawaanaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimikawimaasiwaanaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimikawimaanaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimikawaasiwaanaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimikawaanaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimikawaasiwaanaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimikawaanaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaasiwaanaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaanaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimikawaasiwaanaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimikawaanaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: nimikaagoosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: nimikaagoonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: gimikaagoosiimwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: gimikaagoomwaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: gimikaagoosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: gimikaagoonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: mikawaasiidogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: mikawaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiidogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: mikawaasiidog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: mikawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: nimikaagoosiiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: nimikaagoominaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: gimikaagoosiiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: gimikaagoominaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimikaagosiinan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimikaagonan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimikaagosiinaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimikaagonaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimikaagosiinan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimikaagonan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omikaagosiinaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omikaagonaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagosiinini
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagonini
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omikaagosiinan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omikaagonan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimikaagosiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimikaagomin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gimikaagosiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gimikaagomin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimikaagosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimikaagon
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimikaagosiinaawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimikaagonaawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimikaagosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimikaagon
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omikaagosiinaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omikaagonaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagosiinini
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagonini
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omikaagosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omikaagon
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimikaagosiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimikaagomin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagosiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagomin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimikoosinooninim
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimikooninim
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimikoosinoon
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimikoon
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimikawaasiig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimikawaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimikawimaasiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimikawimaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimikawaasiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimikawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimikawisiim
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimikawim
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimikawaasiwaawaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimikawaawaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaasiwaawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimikawaasiwaawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimikawaawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimikawisiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimikawimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimikawisiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimikaw
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimikawaasiig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimikawaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaasiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimikawaasiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimikawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimikawisiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimikawimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimikaagosiig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimikaagoog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimikaagosiiwaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimikaagowaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimikaagosiig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimikaagoog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikawaasiwaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikawaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimikaagosiinaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimikaagonaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagosiinaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagonaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omikaagosiiwaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omikaagowaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omikaagosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omikaagoon
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimikaagosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimikaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimikaagosiiwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimikaagowaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimikaagosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimikaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikawaasiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimikaagosiinaan
